Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14G-109]
Information to be furnished enrollees; hearings and appeals of enrollees.
Every managed care plan that makes its own rates, within a reasonable time
after receiving written request therefore and upon payment of reasonable
charges as it may make, shall furnish to any enrollee affected by a rate made
by it or to the authorized representative of the enrollee, all pertinent
information as to the rate; provided that the managed care plan shall
not be required to disclose supporting information and supplementary rating
information protected pursuant to section 431:14G-105(d). [L 2007, c 175, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next